Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 336.211 is amended to read:
336.211. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Education provider” means:
(A) An entity that offers a  program that is recognized as an Oregon prekindergarten program
under ORS 329.170 to 329.200.
(B) A school district board.
(b) “Eye examination” means an eye examination that:
(A) Is conducted by a person licensed by the Oregon Board of Optometry  under ORS 683.010 to
683.340 or a person licensed by the Oregon Medical Board under ORS chapter  677 and trained in
eye surgery and eye disease; and
(B) Involves any diagnosis of the eye and any measurement or  assistance of the powers or range
of vision of the eye.
(c) “Vision screening” means an eye  screening test to identify potential vision health problems
that is conducted by  a person who is :
(A) [ A person ] Licensed by the Oregon Board of Optometry under ORS 683.010 to 683.340;
(B) [A person ] Licensed by the Oregon Medical Board  under ORS chapter 677 and trained in eye
surgery and eye disease;
(C) A  health care practitioner acting in accordance with rules adopted by the State Board of
Education; or
(D) A school nurse, an employee of an education provider or a  person or nonprofit entity des-
ignated by the Department of Education to provide vision screening  to students who is acting in
accordance with rules adopted by the State Board of Education.
(2)(a) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, each  education provider shall require
a student who is seven years of age or younger and who is beginning an  educational program with
the education provider for the first time to submit certification that the student received:
(A) A vision screening or an eye examination; and
(B) Any further examinations or necessary treatments of the eye  or assistance of the powers or
range of vision of the eye.
Enrolled Senate Bill 222 (SB 222-INTRO) Page 1
(b) The certification required by this subsection must be provided no later than 120 days  after
the student begins the educational program.
(3) A student is not required to submit certification as required under  subsection (2) of this
section if the student provides a statement from the parent or guardian of the student that:
(a) The student submitted certification to a prior education provider; or
(b) The vision screening  or eye examination is contrary to the religious beliefs of the student
or the parent or guardian of the student.
(4) Each education provider shall:
(a) Ensure that the requirements of this section are met. Failure by a student  to meet the re-
quirements of this section may not result in  a program’s or school’s prohibiting the student from
attending the program or school, but may result in withholding report cards or similar actions.
(b) File in the student’s vision health  record any certifications and any results of a vision
screening or an eye examination known by the education provider.
(c) Provide the parent or guardian of  each student with information about the vision screenings
and eye examinations, and information about further examinations or necessary treatments.
(5)(a) Upon application of [ an education provider ] a person  that provides students  with vision
screenings, the Department of Education  shall reimburse the [ education provider ] person for any
necessary expenses incurred by the [ education provider ] person in the provision of the vision
screenings[ , including any expenses related to contracting with a person or nonprofit entity ].
(b) [ An education provider ] A person  may receive reimbursement under this subsection  for the
provision of a vision screening to any student of [ the] an education provider, regardless of  whether
the student has complied with subsection (2) or (3) of this section. Nothing in  this paragraph re-
moves the requirement that a student must comply with subsection (2) or (3) of this section.
(c) Reimbursements made under this subsection:
(A) May not exceed $3.20 per vision screening per student per school year.
(B) Must be paid from the Vision Health Account established under ORS 336.212.
(C) May not exceed amounts available in the Vision Health Account.
(6)(a) The State Board of  Education, in consultation with the Oregon Health Policy Board, shall
adopt by rule any standards for the implementation of this section.
(b) The State Board of Education shall adopt rules that:
(A) Prescribe the process by which a person or  nonprofit entity is designated by the Department
of Education to provide vision screenings; and
(B) Establish the process for providing reimbursements under subsection (5) of this section,  in-
cluding the prioritization of [ education providers ] persons to receive a reimbursement if the total
amount available for reimbursements exceeds the total amount requested for reimbursements.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 336.212 is amended to read:
336.212. (1) The Vision  Health Account is established in the State Treasury, separate and dis-
tinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the account shall be credited to the account.
(2) Moneys in the account are continuously appropriated to the  Department of Education to
make reimbursements [ to education providers ] for expenses  incurred for the provision of vision
screenings, as described in ORS 336.211 (5).
(3) The department, on behalf of the State of Oregon, may solicit  and accept gifts, grants and
donations from public and  private sources for the provision of vision screenings. Moneys received
under this subsection shall be deposited into the account.
(4) From  the moneys appropriated by the Legislative Assembly to the account each biennium,
the department may retain no more than a total of 10 percent  of the moneys for administrative ex-
penses incurred by the department in making reimbursements [ to education providers ].
SECTION 3. The amendments to ORS 336.211 by section 1 of this 2021 Act apply to ex-
penses incurred for  vision screenings provided on or after the effective date of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 4. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Education, for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2021, out of the
Enrolled Senate Bill 222 (SB 222-INTRO) Page 2
General Fund, the amount of $1,500,000, to be deposited in the Vision Health  Account estab-
lished under ORS 336.212.
SECTION 5. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
Passed by Senate June 16, 2021
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 22, 2021
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 222 (SB 222-INTRO) Page 3